Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201419-5207
Land bank; powers; no power of eminent
domain.

(1)
A land bank shall have the following powers:

(a) To adopt,
amend, and repeal bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business;

(b) To sue and be sued in its own name and plead and be impleaded
in all civil actions;

(c) To borrow money from private lenders, from municipalities,
from the state, or from federal government funds as may be necessary for the
operation and work of the land bank;

(d) To issue negotiable revenue bonds and
notes according to the provisions of the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act;

(e) To procure
insurance or guarantees from the state or federal government of the payments
of any debts or parts thereof incurred by the land bank and to pay premiums
in connection therewith;

(f) To enter into contracts and other instruments necessary, incidental,
or convenient to the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers,
including, but not limited to, agreements under the Interlocal Cooperation
Act for the joint exercise of powers under the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank
Act;

(g) To enter into contracts and other instruments necessary, incidental,
or convenient to the performance of functions by the land bank on behalf of
municipalities or agencies or departments of municipalities, or the performance
by municipalities or agencies or departments of municipalities of functions
on behalf of the land bank;

(h) To make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the land
bank;

(i) To provide foreclosure prevention counseling and re-housing
assistance;

(j) To procure insurance against losses in connection with the
real property, assets, or activities of the land bank;

(k) To invest
money of the land bank, at the discretion of the board, in instruments, obligations,
securities, or property determined proper by the board and name and use depositories
for its money;

(l) To enter into contracts for the management of, the collection
of rent from, or the sale of real property of the land bank;

(m) To design,
develop, construct, demolish, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, relocate,
and otherwise improve real property or rights or interests in real property
of the land bank;

(n) To fix, charge, and collect fees and charges for services provided
by the land bank;

(o) To fix, charge, and collect rents and leasehold payments for
the use of real property of the land bank for a period not to exceed twelve
months, except that such twelve-month limitation shall not apply if the real
property of the land bank is subject to a lease with a remaining term of more
than twelve months at the time such real property is acquired by the land
bank;

(p) To grant or acquire a license, easement, lease, as lessor and
as lessee, or option with respect to real property of the land bank;

(q) To enter
into partnerships, joint ventures, and other collaborative relationships with
municipalities and other public and private entities for the ownership, management,
development, and disposition of real property; and

(r) To do all other things
necessary or convenient to achieve the objectives and purposes of the land
bank or other laws that relate to the purposes and responsibilities of the
land bank.

(2) A land bank shall neither possess nor exercise the power of
eminent domain.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 7.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.